Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202685-1436
Prior Learning Act, how cited.

Sections 85-1436 to 85-1441 shall be known and may be cited as the Prior Learning Act.

Laws 2026, LB937, § 20.
July 18, 2026